Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.900

Transfer of certain powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health services.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health services and the special commitment center pertaining to indigent defense under chapter 71.09 RCW are transferred to the office of public defense.

(2)(a) The office of public defense may request any written materials in the possession of the department of social and health services and the special commitment center pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred, which shall be delivered to the custody of the office of public defense. Materials may be transferred electronically and/or in hard copy, as agreed by the agencies. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the office of public defense.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 2012, be transferred and credited to the office of public defense.

(3) Notwithstanding July 1, 2012, if implementation of office of public defense contracts would result in the substitution of counsel within one hundred eighty days of a scheduled trial date, the director of the office of public defense may continue defense services with existing counsel to facilitate continuity of effective representation and avoid further continuance of a trial. When existing counsel is maintained, payment to complete the trial shall be prorated based on standard contract fees established by the office of public defense under RCW 2.70.025 and, at the director's discretion, may include extraordinary compensation based on attorney documentation.

[ 2012 c 257 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 257: See note following RCW 2.70.020.